Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1
O

IL WELL REWARD

12-4-20. Amount of reward; eligibility for reward.

There shall be paid the sum of $250,000.00 to the first person, firm, or corporation, or combination thereof, which puts down and brings in the first commercial oil well in this state, provided that such well must produce at least 100 barrels of oil per day. The determination as to whether such well is producing this amount is vested in the commissioner of natural resources.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 265, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 514, § 2.)

Cross references.

- Gratuities prohibited, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. VI.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1983, p. 514,

§

1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides as follows: "It is the intent of this Act to implement the provisions of Article III, Section VI, Paragraph VI of the Constitution of the State of Georgia."

12-4-21. Manner of distribution of reward.

Such amount shall be distributed as follows:

The sum of $50,000.00 to the owner or owners of the minerals or the property, or both, where the well is drilled, to be divided, where there are multiple owners of the minerals, among them in the proportion of their respective interest therein; provided, however, that the owner or owners of any mineral interest which does not include oil shall not share in such payment;

The sum of $100,000.00 to the company or individual, or combination of persons, firms, and corporations, which drills or causes to be drilled such oil well, being those persons, firms, or corporations which own the working interest in the well as "working interest" is known and defined in the oil industry;

The sum of $87,500.00 to the contractor who furnishes the equipment for the drilling of such well, and who performs the job of drilling and completion of the well, provided that if there is more than one contractor, such sum shall be divided only between or among those who engage in drilling the well and in completing same for production and who carry out and complete their contracts;

The sum of $12,500.00 to be equally divided among the workmen and employees actually engaged in the job of drilling and completing the well, being those persons certified to the Governor by the contractor or contractors, or owners of the working interest, or both, as being his or their bona fide employees who were working on the job when the drilling, or completion of the well for production, or the contractor's contract, was completed, or who otherwise carried out and completed their employment.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 265, § 2.)

12-4-22. Authorization for Governor to make payments from surplus or contingent funds.

The Governor is authorized to make the payments provided for in this part from the surplus or the contingent funds, or both, of the state.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 265, § 3.)